Maryland, session 2026, SB0533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0533*

SENATE BILL 533
2–324.
(a) This section applies only in Frederick County.
(b) (1) The Sheriff of Frederick County shall receive an annual salary of:
(I) $125,000 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2026;
(II) $175,000 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2027; AND
(III) 82.5% OF THE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR FREDERICK
COUNTY’S ANNUAL SALARY INCLUDING ANY INCREMENTS AND SALARY
ADJUSTMENTS AUTHORIZED UNDER § 15–411(B)(2) OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE
ARTICLE FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2028 AND EACH SUBSEQUENT CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) ANY CHANGE IN THE SALARY PAID TO THE STATE’S ATTORNEY
FOR FREDERICK COUNTY DURING THE TERM OF OFFICE OF THE SHERIFF MAY NOT
APPLY DURING THE SHERIFF’S CURRENT TERM OF OFFICE, BUT THE CHANGED RATE
SHALL TAKE EFFECT AT THE BEGINNING OF THE NEXT FOLLOWING TERM OF OFFICE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Frederick County while serving in a term of
office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions of this Act
concerning the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Frederick County shall take effect
at the beginning of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to an
individual appointed or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired
term. A Sheriff of Frederick County whose term begins after the effective date of this Act
may not receive during the term of office of the Sheriff an increase in salary or
compensation as a result of the increase in the salary of the State’s Attorney for Frederick
County if the increase of the salary of the State’s Attorney for Frederick County was not
fixed at the time the term of office of the Sheriff began.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.